Tennessee, session 114, HB1614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (63).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee motor vehicle commission, created by § 55-17-103;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1614
010115
- 1 -